Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2605, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 485, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2605), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2605. A. Each school year, every fifth- through


eleventh-grade student in the public and private schools of this


state and students who are educated by other means and are in the


equivalent of the fifth through eleventh grade shall be apprised,


together with the parent, custodial parent, or guardian of the


student, of the opportunity for access to higher learning under the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program. The Oklahoma State Regents

Req. No. 3357 Page 1


for Higher Education and the State Board of Education shall develop,


promote, and coordinate a public awareness program to be utilized in


making students and parents aware of the Oklahoma Higher Learning


Access Program.


B. On a form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education, every public school district shall designate at least one


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program contact person, who shall be


a counselor or teacher, at each public school site in this state in


which eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade classes are taught.


When requested by the State Regents, the State Board of Education


shall assist the State Regents to ensure the designation of contact


persons. Private schools shall also designate at least one school


official as a contact person. For students who are educated by


other means, a parent or guardian or other person approved by the


State Regents shall be designated the contact person.


C. 1. Students who qualify on the basis of financial need


according to subsection D or E of this section or who meet the


eligibility qualification set forth in subparagraph a of paragraph 1


of subsection B of Section 2603 of this title no later than December


of their twelfth-grade year or prior to reaching the age of


seventeen (17) and who qualify on the basis of the standards and


provisions promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education shall be given the opportunity throughout the eighth-,


ninth-, tenth-, and eleventh-grade years and no later than December

Req. No. 3357 Page 2


of the twelfth-grade year, for students enrolled in a public or


private school, or between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen


(17), for students who are educated by other means, to enter into


participation in the program by agreeing to, throughout the


remainder of their school years or educational program:


a. attend school or an educational program regularly and


do homework regularly,


b. refrain from substance abuse,


c. refrain from commission of crimes or delinquent acts,


d. have school work and school records reviewed by


mentors designated pursuant to the program,


e. provide information requested by the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education or the State Board of


Education, and


f. participate in program activities.


2. Students who meet the eligibility qualification set forth in


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 2603 of


this title after December 31 of their twelfth-grade year or after


reaching the age of eighteen (18) shall be given the opportunity


prior to reaching the age of twenty-one (21) to enter into


participation in the program and shall execute an agreement with


provisions as determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education.



Req. No. 3357 Page 3


3. The contact person shall maintain the agreements, which


shall be executed on forms provided by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education and managed according to regulations


promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, and


the contact person shall monitor compliance of the student with the


terms of the agreement. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education are authorized to process student agreements and verify


compliance with the agreements. Students failing to comply with the


terms of the agreement shall not be eligible for the awards provided


in Section 2604 of this title.


4. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may provide


an exception to the age limits provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of


this subsection pursuant to subsection L of this section.


5. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 5-132 and 5-132.1


of this title, a student who is age twenty-one (21) or older shall


not be eligible to enter into participation in the program.


D. Except as otherwise provided for in subsection E of this


section and except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B


of Section 2603 of this title, a student shall not be found to be in


financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program if:


1. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, or tenth-grade students who


are enrolled in a public or private school or students between the


ages of thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) who are educated by other

Req. No. 3357 Page 4


means who apply for participation in the program in the 2017-2018


school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s) exceeds Fifty-five Thousand Dollars ($55,000.00) per year;


2. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students


between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated


by other means who apply for participation in the program in the


2021-2022 school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the


student’s parent(s) exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per


year;


3. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students


between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated


by other means who apply for participation in the program in the


2022-2023 school year:


a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,


exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,


b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,


exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per


year, or





Req. No. 3357 Page 5


c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,


exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;


4. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students or twelfth-grade students no later than December 31 of


their twelfth-grade year who are enrolled in a public or private


school or students between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen


(17) who are educated by other means who apply for participation in


the program in the 2025-2026 school year:


a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,


exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,


b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,


exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per


year, or


c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,


exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;


5. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students or twelfth-grade students no later than December 31 of


their twelfth grade year who are enrolled in a public or private


school or students between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen



Req. No. 3357 Page 6


(17) who are educated by other means who apply for participation in


the program in the 2027-2028 school year:


a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,


exceeds One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per


year,


b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,


exceeds One Hundred Ten Thousand Dollars ($110,000.00)


per year, or


c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,


exceeds One Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars


($120,000.00) per year;


6. Beginning with the 2018-2019 2027-2028 academic year, prior


to receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit


award for any year during which the student is enrolled in an


institution which that is a member of The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education, a postsecondary vocational-technical program


offered by a technology center school that meets the requirements to


be eligible for federal student financial aid, or a private


institution of higher learning located within this state and


accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, the federal


adjusted gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds One Hundred

Req. No. 3357 Page 7


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) One Hundred Thirty Thousand Dollars


($130,000.00) per year.


The determination of financial qualification as set forth in


this paragraph shall be based on the income of the student, not the


income of the parent(s), if a student:


a. is determined to be independent of the student’s


parents for federal financial aid purposes,


b. was in the permanent custody of the Department of


Human Services at the time the student enrolled in the


program, or


c. was in the court-ordered custody of a federally


recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal


Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, at the time the


student enrolled in the program.


The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to any student who


has received an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit


award after the 2017-2018 school year; and


6. 7. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


review the determination of financial qualification as set forth in


paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4, and 5 of this subsection if the income


from taxable and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s)


includes income received from nontaxable military benefits or income


received from the federal Social Security Administration due to the


death or disability of the student’s parent(s). If the income from

Req. No. 3357 Page 8


taxable and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s), excluding


income received from nontaxable military benefits or income received


from the federal Social Security Administration due to the death or


disability of the student’s parent(s), does not exceed the


limitations set forth by paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4, and 5 of this


subsection, the student shall be determined to have met the


financial qualification set forth in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4, and


of this subsection.


E. 1. A student who was adopted between birth and twelve (12)


years of age while in the permanent custody of the Department of


Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a licensed private


nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally recognized Indian


tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978,


shall not be found to be in financial need for purposes of the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the time the student


begins postsecondary education and prior to receiving any Oklahoma


Higher Learning Access Program benefit award, the federal adjusted


gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds One Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) per year. The provisions of this


paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2012-2013 school year.


2. A student who was adopted between thirteen (13) and


seventeen (17) years of age while in the permanent custody of the

Req. No. 3357 Page 9


Department of Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a


licensed private nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally


recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child


Welfare Act of 1978, shall not be found to be in financial need for


purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the


time the student begins postsecondary education and prior to


receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award,


the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds


Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) per year. The provisions


of this paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2012-2013 school year.


3. A student who was placed in the custody of the Department of


Human Services at any time during the eighth, ninth, tenth, or


eleventh grade and enrolls in the program no later than his or her


official date of high school graduation shall not be found to be in


financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program if the federal adjusted gross income of the student exceeds


Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year.


4. Except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B of


Section 2603 of this title, the determination of financial


qualification as set forth in this subsection shall be based on the


income of the student, not the income of the parent(s), if the


student is determined to be independent of the student’s parent(s)

Req. No. 3357 Page 10


for federal financial aid purposes. A determination of financial


qualification shall not be required for the student who meets the


criteria set forth in this subsection at the time the student


applies for participation in the program. The provisions of this


paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2008-2009 school year.


5. a. A student who is the child of a certified classroom


teacher at the time the student applies for


participation in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program shall not be found to be in financial need for


the purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program if, beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or


eleventh-grade students or twelfth-grade students no


later than December 31 of their twelfth-grade year who


are enrolled in a public or private school or students


between thirteen (13) and seventeen (17) years of age


who are educated by other means who apply for


participation in the program in the 2025-2026 school


year, the household income of the student’s parent(s)


is equal to or greater than seven hundred percent


(700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).


b. Prior to receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program benefit award for any year during which the

Req. No. 3357 Page 11


student is enrolled in an institution that is a member


of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, a


postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by


a technology center school that meets the eligibility


requirements for federal student financial aid, or a


private institution of higher learning located within


this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of


this title, the household income of the parent(s) of a


student who qualifies pursuant to this paragraph shall


not be equal to or greater than seven hundred percent


(700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).


c. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


verify the full-time employment status of the


student’s parent(s) prior to a student who qualifies


pursuant to this paragraph receiving any Oklahoma


Higher Learning Access Program benefit award.


d. For the purposes of this paragraph, “certified


classroom teacher” means a certified, full-time


classroom teacher who has been employed as a teacher


in a public school district classroom in this state


for a minimum of ten (10) years prior to his or her


child applying for participation in the program. The


teacher is not required to have been employed by the


same public school district for ten (10) consecutive

Req. No. 3357 Page 12


years. Certified classroom teacher does not mean a


certified teacher who is employed as a school district


superintendent, principal, or any other position


within the administration of a public school district


when his or her child applies for participation in the


program or prior to his or her child receiving any


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award.


F. The financial qualification of a student as set forth in


subsections D and E of this section shall be certified by the


contact person or by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education


on the agreement form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education. The form shall be retained in the permanent


record of the student and a copy forwarded to the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education.


G. Agreements shall be witnessed by the parent, custodial


parent, or guardian of the student, who shall further agree to:


1. Assist the student in achieving compliance with the


agreements;


2. Confer, when requested to do so, with the school contact


person, other school personnel, and program mentors;


3. Provide information requested by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education or the State Board of Education; and


4. Assist the student in completing forms and reports required


for program participation, making applications to institutions and

Req. No. 3357 Page 13


schools of higher learning, and filing applications for student


grants and scholarships.


H. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules for the determination of student compliance with


agreements made pursuant to this section.


I. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


designate personnel to coordinate tracking of program records for


the years when students participating in the program are still in


the schools or are being educated by other means, provide staff


development for contact persons in the schools, and provide liaison


with the State Board of Education and local organizations and


individuals participating in the program.


J. The school district where an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program student is enrolled when the student begins participation in


the program and any subsequent school district where the student


enrolls shall forward information regarding participation by the


student in the program to a school to which the student transfers


upon the request of the school for the records of the student.


K. Students participating in the Oklahoma Higher Learning


Access Program shall provide their Social Security number or their


student identification number used by their school to the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education. The State Regents shall keep


the numbers confidential and use them only for administrative


purposes.

Req. No. 3357 Page 14


L. The State Regents may provide an exception to the age limits


provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection C of this section


to a student due to hardship circumstances and allow an application


to the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program for twelfth-grade


students enrolled in a public or private school and students who are


educated by other means and are in the equivalent of twelfth grade.


Provided, however, the exception due to hardship circumstances shall


not apply to:


1. A student enrolled in a public or private school after the


student’s official date of high school graduation;


2. A student educated by other means who is age nineteen (19)


or older; or


3. Any student who is age twenty-one (21) or older.


The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall promulgate


rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3357 EB 12/30/2025 9:11:31 AM













Req. No. 3357 Page 15